Nevada, session 83, SB282.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, for
the purposes of NRS 232.496 to 232.4969, inclusive, and sections 2
to 5, inclusive, of this act, a food desert is a census tract that in the
immediately preceding census meets one of the following:
(a) Poverty standards:
(1) At least 20 percent of households within the census tract
have a household income that falls below the federally designated
level signifying poverty;
(2) The census tract is not located within a metropolitan
statistical area, as defined by the United States Office of
Management and Budget, and the median family income within
the tract is 80 percent or less than the median household income
in this State; or
(3) The census tract is located within a metropolitan
statistical area, as defined by the United States Office of
Management and Budget, and the median family income within
the tract is 80 percent or less than the greater of the median
household income in this State or the median family income in the
metropolitan statistical area; and
(b) Population and food accessibility standards:
(1) The census tract is a rural tract and at least 33 percent
of the population of the census tract or 500 or more residents of
the census tract reside more than 10 miles from the nearest
grocery store; or
(2) The census tract is an urban tract and at least 33
percent of the population of the census tract or 500 or more
-
*SB282_R1*

– 3 –
residents of the census tract reside more than 0.5 miles from the
nearest grocery store.
2. The Department may by regulation designate as a food
desert one or more existing areas that do not meet the
requirements set forth in subsection 1 based on data that includes,
without limitation, poverty levels and access to grocery stores.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Block” means the smallest geographical unit whose
boundaries were designated by the Bureau of the Census of the
United States Department of Commerce in its topographically
integrated geographic encoding and referencing system.
(b) “Block group” means a combination of blocks whose
numbers begin with the same digit.
(c) “Census tract” means a combination of block groups.
(d) “Rural tract” means a census tract that is not an urban
tract.
(e) “Urban tract” means a census tract with a geographic
centroid located in an urban area designated by the Bureau of the
Census of the United States Department of Commerce.
Sec. 3. 1. The Department shall, in coordination with the
Council on Food Security, establish and administer the Grocery
Initiative to award grants of money and provide technical
assistance and other information to grocery stores in this State to
expand access to healthy foods in food deserts and any areas at
risk of becoming food deserts in this State.
2. The Department shall, to the extent money is available,
award grants of money from the Grocery Initiative established
pursuant to subsection 1 to a grocery store in this State for:
(a) Studies of market and site feasibility;
(b) Marketing and promotional materials;
(c) Paying the salaries or benefits of persons employed by the
grocery store;
(d) Paying the rent of the building or making a down payment
on the purchase of a building or other facility of the grocery store;
(e) Purchasing ownership of an existing grocery store to
establish a new grocery store;
(f) Capital improvements, planning, renovations, land
acquisition, demolition or equipment purchases; or
(g) Any other costs the Department determines are eligible for
a grant.
3. In addition to the provisions of subsection 2 and except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, the Department may award
grants of money from the Grocery Initiative to existing grocery
stores in this State for equipment upgrades. The award of a grant
of money pursuant to this subsection must prioritize equipment
-
*SB282_R1*

– 4 –
that is energy efficient. The Department may not award more than
20 percent of the total amount available in any fiscal year for the
Grocery Initiative to award grants of money pursuant to this
subsection.
4. The Department may establish:
(a) Limitations on the size of grocery stores which are eligible
to receive a grant, which may include, without limitation,
limitations based on the annual revenue or projected revenue of
the grocery store, the number of full-time employees of the grocery
store or the square footage of the grocery store; and
(b) Priorities for the award of grants from the Grocery
Initiative, which may include, without limitation, poverty levels
and median household income in the area, geographic diversity of
the area, local ownership, access to grocery stores in the area or
any other factors established by the Department.
5. The Director may, based upon the recommendations of the
Council on Food Security, adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 4. A grocery store is eligible to receive assistance from
the Grocery Initiative established by the Department pursuant to
section 3 of this act if the grocery store is an existing or planned
retail establishment, whether organized for profit or not for profit
and whether independently owned, cooperatively owned or owned
and operated by a local government, which:
1. Is principally devoted to the business of selling groceries,
including, without limitation, fresh fruits and vegetables;
2. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, derives
or will derive not more than 30 percent of its gross revenue from
sales of tobacco and alcohol in any given year;
3. Accepts or will accept payment from benefits authorized
under Supplemental Nutrition Assistance or the Special
Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and
Children established by 42 U.S.C. § 1786; and
4. Provides or will provide for the retail sale of a substantial
variety of perishable foods, including, without limitation, fresh or
frozen dairy products and fresh fruits, vegetable, meats, poultry
and fish.
Sec. 5. 1. To the extent money is available, the Department:
(a) Shall provide technical assistance to any person awarded a
grant from the Grocery Initiative and to other small,
independently owned grocery stores in this State to ensure the
long-term viability and business success of the grantee or
independent grocery store. The technical assistance may include,
without limitation, business planning, marketing, financing,
supply chain management and workforce development assistance.
-
*SB282_R1*

– 5 –
(b) Shall make available on the Internet website of the
Department information and materials to assist the growth and
development of grantees and other grocery stores in this State.
(c) May enter into contracts and other lawful agreements with
public or private entities to carry out the requirements of this
section.
2. The Department may apply for and accept gifts, grants,
donations and contributions from any source to carry out the
provisions of sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 6. NRS 232.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.290 As used in NRS 232.290 to 232.4983, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act, unless the context requires
otherwise:
1. “Department” means the Department of Health and Human
Services.
2. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
Sec. 7. NRS 232.4968 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.4968 The Council on Food Security created by NRS
232.4966 shall:
1. Develop, coordinate and implement a food system that will:
(a) Partner with initiatives in economic development and social
determinants of health;
(b) Increase access to improved food resource programs;
(c) Increase participation in federal nutrition programs by
eligible households; and
(d) Increase capacity to produce, process, distribute and
purchase food in an affordable and sustainable manner.
2. Research and develop recommendations on community
gardens and urban farms, which must include, without limitation:
(a) Examinations of:
(1) Local and regional efforts to develop community gardens
and urban farms;
(2) Regulatory and policy barriers to the development of
community gardens and urban farms; and
(3) The potential effects of community gardens and urban
farms on economic development in this State; and
(b) Recommendations to:
(1) Promote the use of community gardens and urban farms
in this State;
(2) Strengthen local infrastructure for community gardens
and urban farms; and
(3) Promote entrepreneurial efforts to develop community
gardens and urban farms.
-
*SB282_R1*

– 6 –
3. Research and develop recommendations relating to food
insecurity in urban and rural food deserts in this State, which
may, without limitation:
(a) Include an exploration of:
(1) The reasons for current market failures and potential
solutions to such market failures;
(2) Geographic trends relating to food security in urban
and rural food deserts;
(3) The need for independent grocery stores; and
(4) Any disparities in ownership of grocery stores by
minority groups, women and persons with disabilities.
(b) Identify areas in this State at risk of becoming food deserts.
4. Hold public hearings to receive public comment and to
discuss issues related to food security in this State.
[4.] 5. Serve as a clearinghouse for the review and approval of
any events or projects initiated in the name of the Plan.
[5.] 6. Review and comment on any proposed federal, state or
local legislation and regulation that would affect the food policy
system of this State.
[6.] 7. Advise and inform the Governor on the food policy of
this State.
[7.] 8. Review grant proposals and alternative funding sources
as requested by the Director to provide recommendations for
funding the Plan.
[8.] 9. Develop new resources related to the Plan.
[9.] 10. Advise, assist and make recommendations to the
Director for the creation and administration of the Program.
[10.] 11. On or before January 31 of each year submit an
annual report to the Director and the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau concerning the accomplishments and
recommendations of the Council concerning food security,
including, without limitation, any recommendations concerning
food deserts, community gardens and urban farms.
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the
sum of $10,000,000 for the Grocery Initiative established pursuant
to section 3 of this act to award grants of money and provide
technical assistance and other information and materials to grocery
stores in this State pursuant to sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act. The
Department may expend not more than 1 percent of the money
appropriated pursuant to this section for the administrative costs
associated with operating the program.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
-
*SB282_R1*

– 7 –
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 9. On or before February 1, 2027, the Council on Food
Security created by NRS 232.4966 shall submit to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the 84th Session of
the Legislature a written report summarizing the research and
recommendations developed by the Council pursuant to subsection
3 of NRS 232.4968, as amended by section 7 of this act, relating to
food insecurity in urban and rural food deserts in this State.
H
-
*SB282_R1*